Hawaii statutes.
§286-109 General provision governing the
issuance of licenses. (a) Upon payment of the required fee and upon
demonstrating the ability to operate a certain category or categories of motor
vehicles to the satisfaction of the examiner of drivers, an applicant for a
driver's license shall be issued a single license of a design approved by the
director of transportation upon which is made a notation of:

(1) The category or categories of motor vehicles the
applicant may operate;

(2) Any restrictive provisions to which the license
is subject;

(3) Veteran status, if desired by the applicant;
provided that the notation shall be on the front of the license and shall not
include any designation other than the term "veteran"; and

(4) When the license is issued to a person under
twenty-one years of age, a statement, in clearly legible print that shall
contrast with the other information appearing on the license, which indicates
the date on which the person will attain the age of twenty-one years.

As used in this subsection, "veteran"
means any person who served in any of the uniformed services of the United
States and was discharged under conditions other than dishonorable.

(b) The examiner of drivers shall not issue or
renew any driver's license using the driver's social security number on the
driver's license.

(c) Statutes of limitations and other
provisions of this chapter notwithstanding, no driver's license or instruction
permit shall be issued or renewed under this section, where the examiner of
drivers is notified by the district judge, traffic violations bureaus of the
district courts, or the judge of the circuit court that the applicant has
failed to respond to a traffic citation or summons, or failed to appear in
court after an arrest for the violation of any traffic laws of a county, this
chapter or chapter 286G, 287, 290, 291, or 291C, or of any motor vehicle
insurance laws under article 10C of chapter 431, or of any motorcycle or motor
scooter insurance laws under article 10G of chapter 431, and the same remains
delinquent and outstanding, or the applicant, has as of the time of the
application, failed to comply in full with all orders of the court; provided
that the district court with whose order an applicant has failed to comply in
full, may approve the issuance or renewal of a driver's license or instruction
permit other than a commercial driver's license upon conditions imposed by the
court for the satisfaction of the outstanding court order and any other
conditions as may be imposed by the court, if one or more of the following
conditions are met:

(1) The applicant is gainfully employed in a position
that requires driving and will be discharged if the applicant is unable to
drive; or

(2) The applicant has no access to alternative
transportation and therefore must drive to work;

provided further that if the applicant has failed to
comply in full with orders of the district court of more than one circuit, the
applicant shall obtain the approval of the district court of each circuit in
which the applicant has an outstanding court order before a driver's license or
instruction permit may be issued or renewed under this subsection.

A driver's license or instruction permit issued
or renewed under this subsection shall be subject to immediate suspension by
the court upon the applicant's failure to remain in full compliance with all
conditions imposed by the court for the issuance or renewal of the driver's
license or instruction permit. The examiner of drivers may place an indication
of restriction upon a driver's license or instruction permit issued or renewed
under this subsection. Proof of financial responsibility under section 287-20
shall not apply to the issuance or renewal of driver's licenses or instruction
permits under this subsection. [L 1967, c 214, pt of §2; HRS §286-109; am L
1970, c 164, §3; am L 1975, c 24, §7; am L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, §12; am L 1985, c
107, §1; am L 1990, c 9, §1; am L 1999, c 269, §1; am L 2002, c 105, §2; am L
2014, c 6, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next